New Jersey, session 222, S4664.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. The following language provisions is added to section 1 of P.L.2026, c.27, the annual appropriations act for fiscal year 2027. 10 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE 40 Community Development and Environmental Management 49 Agricultural Resources, Planning, and Regulation STATE AID Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for the Working Class Families State Supplement (P.L.2022, c.104, as amended by P.L.2023, c.336) (PTRF), 2.5 percent of such funds shall be utilized for informational and outreach activities to increase awareness of the program. 2. This act shall take effect immediately.